Maryland, session 2026, HB1405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
13–235.
(a) This section applies to the following [officials] INDIVIDUALS:
(1) the Governor;
(2) the Lieutenant Governor;
(3) the Attorney General;
(4) the Comptroller;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1405*

HOUSE BILL 1405
(5) the State Treasurer; [and]
(6) a member of the General Assembly; AND
(7) A CANDIDATE FOR AN OFFICE LISTED IN THIS SUBSECTION.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), (d), or (e) of this section, during a regular
session of the General Assembly an [official] INDIVIDUAL described in subsection (a) of
this section, or a person acting on behalf of the [official] INDIVIDUAL, may not, as to a
candidate for federal, State, or local office, or a campaign finance entity of the candidate or
any other campaign finance entity organized under this title and operated in coordination
with a candidate:
(1) receive a contribution;
(2) conduct a fund–raising event;
(3) solicit a contribution; or
(4) deposit or use any contribution of money that was not deposited prior
to the session.
(c) An [official] INDIVIDUAL described in subsection [(a)] (A)(1), (2), (3), (4),
(5), OR (6) of this section, or a person acting on behalf of the [official] INDIVIDUAL, is not
subject to this section when engaged in activities solely related to the [official’s]
INDIVIDUAL’S election to an elective federal or local office for which the [official]
INDIVIDUAL is a filed candidate.
(d) Under the Public Financing Act, a gubernatorial ticket, during the year of the
election only, may accept eligible private contributions and any disbursement of funds by
the State Board that is based on the eligible private contributions.
(e) An [official] INDIVIDUAL described in subsection (a) of this section, or a
person acting on behalf of the [official] INDIVIDUAL, may deposit a contribution during the
legislative session if the contribution was made electronically before the start of the session.
(f) (1) As to a violation of this section, the campaign finance entity of the
[official] INDIVIDUAL in violation is liable for a civil penalty as provided in § 13–604.1 of
this title.
(2) A civil penalty imposed under this subsection shall be distributed to the
Fair Campaign Financing Fund established under § 15–103 of this article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.